Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-33] Form of application; reports to
insurance commissioner by insurer; policy deemed modified upon application for
protection. Any writing signed by the insured and identifying the policy
and the insurer, and agreeing that the insured's rights under the policy are
subject to and modified by this part, shall be sufficient as an application for
the benefits of this part, but the insurance commissioner may require the
insured and insurer to execute other appropriate forms. Upon receipt of the
application of the insured, the insurer shall furnish such report to the
insurance commissioner concerning the policy as shall be prescribed by rules
adopted under chapter 91. When an insured has applied for protection under
this part, the policy is deemed to have been modified to conform to the
provisions of this part. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next